nl: Type meting luchtmassasensor: Analoge spanningsoutput; Digitale (PWM) output; Frequentie-output; Hittefilm; Hittedraad; Kármán-vortex; Luchtmassameter met klep; Overige
nb: Målingstype for massemålingssensor for luftstrøm: Analog spenningsutgang; Digital (PWM)-utgang; Frekvensutgang; Varmfilm; Varmtråd; Kármán-virvel; Vinge/klaff (låvedør); Annet
hu: Légmennyiségmérő mérési típusa: Analóg feszültségkimenet; Digitális (PWM) kimenet; Frekvenciakimenet; Fűtött film; Fűtött szál; Kármán-örvény; Torlólapos / csapóajtós; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип измерване на сензора за масов въздушен поток: Изход за аналогово напрежение; Цифров (PWM) изход; Честотен изход; Горещ филм; Гореща жичка; Вихър на Карман; Клапа/лопатка (тип врата); Друго
el: Τύπος μέτρησης αισθητήρα μάζας αέρα: Αναλογική έξοδος τάσης; Ψηφιακή έξοδος (PWM); Έξοδος συχνότητας; Θερμό φιλμ; Θερμό νήμα; Στρόβιλος Kármán; Πτερύγιο (τύπου barn door); Άλλο
es: Tipo de medición del sensor de flujo de masa de aire: Salida de voltaje analógico; Salida digital (PWM); Salida de frecuencia; Película caliente; Hilo caliente; Vórtice de Kármán; Aleta/compuerta (tipo puerta); Otro
sv: Mättyp för massflödessensor: Analog spänningsutgång; Digital utgång (PWM); Frekvensutgång; Varmfilm; Värmetråd; Kármán-virvel; Vinge/klaff; Annat
sk-SK: Typ merania snímača hmotnostného prietoku vzduchu: Výstup analógového napätia; Digitálny výstup (PWM); Frekvenčný výstup; Horúci film; Horúci drôt; Kármánov vír; Lopatka/klapka; Iný
en: Mass air flow sensor measurement type: Analog voltage output; Digital (PWM) output; Frequency output; Hot film; Hot wire; Kármán vortex; Vane/Flap (barn door); Other
fi: Ilmamassamittarin mittaustyyppi: Analoginen jänniteulostulo; Digitaalinen (PWM) ulostulo; Taajuusulostulo; Kuumakalvo; Kuumalanka; Kármánin pyörre; Siipi/läppä; Muu
cs: Typ měření snímače hmotnostního průtoku vzduchu: Analogový napěťový výstup; Digitální (PWM) výstup; Frekvenční výstup; Horký film; Žhavený drát; Kármánův vír; Lopatka/klapka (barn door); Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de medição do sensor de fluxo de massa de ar: Saída de tensão analógica; Saída digital (PWM); Saída de frequência; Película quente; Fio quente; Vórtice de Kármán; Palheta/aleta (porta de celeiro); Outro
vi: Loại cảm biến đo lưu lượng khí: Đầu ra điện áp analog; Đầu ra kỹ thuật số (PWM); Đầu ra tần số; Màng nóng; Dây nóng; Dòng xoáy Kármán; Cánh gạt/cánh bướm; Khác
da: Måletype for luftmstrømssensor: Analog spændingsudgang; Digital udgang (PWM); Frekvensudgang; Varmefilm; Varmetråd; Kármán-hvirvel; Vinge/klap (ladeport); Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta merjenja senzorja masnega pretoka zraka: Analogni napetostni izhod; Digitalni (PWM) izhod; Frekvenčni izhod; Vroči film; Vroča žica; Kármánov vrtinec; Loputa; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip de măsurare a senzorului debitmetrului de aer: Ieșire tensiune analogică; Ieșire digitală (PWM); Ieșire frecvență; Film cald; Fir cald; Vortex Kármán; Paletă/clapetă; Altele
pl: Typ pomiaru przepływomierza masowego powietrza: Analogowe wyjście napięciowe; Wyjście cyfrowe (PWM); Wyjście częstotliwościowe; Gorący film; Gorący drut; Ścieżka wirowa Kármána; Klapkowy; Inne
fr: Type de mesure du débitmètre d'air massique: Sortie de tension analogique; Sortie numérique (PWM); Sortie de fréquence; Film chaud; Fil chaud; Tourbillons de Karman; Volet/clapet; Autre
it: Tipo di misurazione del sensore di flusso d'aria: Uscita in tensione analogica; Uscita digitale (PWM); Uscita in frequenza; Film caldo; Filo caldo; Vortice di Kármán; A paletta/aletta; Altro
ko: MAF(질량 공기 흐름) 센서 측정 방식: 아날로그 전압 출력; 디지털(PWM) 출력; 주파수 출력; 핫 필름; 열선; 카르만 와류; 베인/플랩(반 도어); 기타
zh-CN: 空气流量传感器测量类型: 模拟电压输出; 数字 (PWM) 输出; 频率输出; 热膜; 热线; 卡门涡街; 翼片/翻板（叶片式）; 其他
ja: 質量空気流量センサー測定タイプ: アナログ電圧出力; デジタル (PWM) 出力; 周波数出力; ホットフィルム; ホットワイヤー; カルマン渦; ベーン/フラップ (バーンドア); その他
ru: Тип измерения датчика массового расхода воздуха: Аналоговый выход по напряжению; Цифровой (ШИМ) выход; Частотный выход; Пленочный; Проволочный; Вихревой (Кармана); Флюгерный; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de medição do sensor de fluxo de massa de ar: Saída de tensão analógica; Saída digital (PWM); Saída de frequência; Filme quente; Fio quente; Vórtice de Kármán; Aleta/Flap (tipo portinhola); Outro
th: ประเภทการวัดของเซ็นเซอร์วัดปริมาณอากาศ: แรงดันไฟฟ้าแอนะล็อกออก; ดิจิทัล (PWM) ออก; เอาต์พุตความถี่; ฮอตฟิล์ม; ลวดนำความร้อน; Kármán vortex; ใบพัด/ลิ้น (บานพับ); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 空氣流量感測器測量類型: 類比電壓輸出; 數位 (PWM) 輸出; 頻率輸出; 熱膜式; 熱線式; 卡門渦旋式; 翼板/擋板 (活動門); 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta mjerenja senzora protoka zraka (MAF): Izlaz analognog napona; Digitalni izlaz (PWM); Frekvencijski izlaz; Vrući film (hot film); Vruća žica (hot wire); Kármánov vrtlog; Krilca/zakrilca (Vane/Flap); Ostalo
de: Messart des Luftmassenmessers: Analoger Spannungsausgang; Digitaler (PWM) Ausgang; Frequenzausgang; Heißfilm; Hitzedraht; Kármán-Wirbel; Stauklappe; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Oro masės srauto jutiklio matavimo tipas: Analoginės įtampos išvestis; Skaitmeninės (PWM) išvestis; Dažnio išvestis; Karštos plėvelės; Karštos vielos; Karmano (Kármán) sūkurio; Menčių / atvartų („Barn door“); Kita
tr: Kütle hava akış sensörü ölçüm tipi: Analog voltaj çıkışı; Dijital (PWM) çıkış; Frekans çıkışı; Sıcak film; Sıcak tel; Kármán girdabı; Kanat/Kapak (barn door); Diğer